Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-341
State park system; areas; designation.

All areas of the state park system shall be appropriately named and adequately designated by signs which shall be uniform in color and design, and of a type commensurate with the specific area. When applicable, state park names shall be indicative of the geography, history, or other natural features of the general area in which the park is located.

Laws 1959, c. 436, § 5, p. 1466;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.25;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 99.